Nebraska, session 109, LB16.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 55 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act.
Sec. 2. It is declared to be the policy of the Legislature to:
(1) Promote adequate, economical, and efficient service by licensees
selling consumable hemp products within the state without unjust or undue
discrimination, preference, or advantage;
(2) Generate revenue by imposing an excise tax upon consumable hemp
products; and
(3) Promote the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the
state by sound and careful control and regulation of the sale of
consumable hemp products.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act:
(1) Cancel means to discontinue all rights and privileges of a
license;
(2) Commission means the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control
Commission;
(3) Conviction includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction
following a plea of nolo contendere;
(4) Covered offense means:
(a) A felony under the laws of any state or the United States; or
(b) A Class I misdemeanor pursuant to Chapter 28, article 3, 4, 7,
8, 10, 11, or 12, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of
another state or the United States.
(5) Hemp has the same meaning as in section 2-503;
(6)(a) Consumable hemp product means a product which includes hemp
and which is intended for human or animal consumption by inhalation or
ingestion.
(b) Consumable hemp product does not include (i) hemp products
intended for topical application or (ii) seeds or seed-derived
ingredients that are generally recognized as safe by the United States
Food and Drug Administration. Such products are not regulated by the
-2-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act;
(7) Identification document means any of the following:
(a) Driver's or operator's license;
(b) State identification card;
(c) Military identification card;
(d) Alien registration card;
(e) Passport; or
(f) Tribal enrollment card;
(8) Licensee means a person licensed as a retailer under the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act;
(9) Local governing body means (a) the city council or village board
of trustees of a city or village within which the licensed premises are
located or (b) if the licensed premises are not within the corporate
limits of a city or village, the county board of the county within which
the licensed premises are located;
(10) Manager means a person appointed by a corporation or limited
liability company to oversee the daily operation of a business licensed
in Nebraska. A manager shall meet all the requirements of the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act as though such person were the applicant,
including residency;
(11) Minor means any individual under twenty-one years of age;
(12) Ordinance means any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation
of a local governing body;
(13) Retailer means a person who sells or offers for sale consumable
hemp products for use or consumption and not for resale in any form;
(14) Revoke means to permanently void and recall all rights and
privileges of a license;
(15) Sale means any transfer, exchange, or barter in any manner or
by any means for consideration and includes any sale made by any person,
whether principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee;
(16) Sell means to solicit or receive an order for, to keep or
-3-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
expose for sale, or to keep with intent to sell;
(17) Sell at retail and sale at retail means sale for use or
consumption and not for resale in any form;
(18) Suspend means to cause a temporary interruption of all rights
and privileges of a license; and
(19) Tribal enrollment card means an identification document:
(a) Issued by a tribe which is recognized by a state or the federal
government; and
(b) Which contains a photograph of the person identified and such
person's date of birth.
Sec. 4. (1) The Nebraska Hemp Control Commission is created. The
commission shall consist of the members of the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission.
(2) A majority of the Nebraska Hemp Control Commission shall
constitute a quorum to transact business, but no vacancy shall impair the
right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all of the powers of the
commission. Every act of a majority of the members of the commission
shall be deemed to be the act of the commission.
(3) The executive director of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission
shall also serve as executive director of the Nebraska Hemp Control
Commission. The executive director shall keep a record of all
proceedings, transactions, communications, and official acts of the
Nebraska Hemp Control Commission. The executive director shall be the
custodian of all records and perform such other duties as the commission
may prescribe.
Sec. 5. (1) The commission may, with the advice and approval of the
Governor, appoint or employ such clerks and other employees as may be
necessary to carry out the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act or to
perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by law upon the
commission.
(2) Employees of the commission who are accountable for public funds
-4-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201 to secure the
safety of such funds. The premium shall be paid by the State of Nebraska
out of the General Fund.
Sec. 6. The commissioners, the executive director of the
commission, and all employees of the commission shall be reimbursed for
expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The commission may also incur necessary
expenses for office furniture and other incidental expenses. No
commissioner, executive director, or employee of the commission shall
request or be allowed mileage or other traveling expenses unless such
sections are strictly complied with.
Sec. 7. (1) The office of the commission shall be in Lincoln, but
the commission may, with the approval of the Governor, establish and
maintain branch offices at places other than the seat of government.
(2) The commission shall hold regular meetings at least once a month
and may hold such special meetings as it deems necessary at any time and
at any place within the state.
(3) The commission may, for authentication of its records, process,
and proceedings, adopt, keep, and use a common seal, of which seal
judicial notice shall be taken in all of the courts of the state. Any
process, notice, or other paper which the commission is authorized by law
to issue shall be deemed sufficient if signed by the chairperson and
executive director of the commission and authenticated by such seal. All
acts, orders, proceedings, rules, regulations, entries, minutes, and
other records of the commission and all reports and documents filed with
the commission may be proved in any court of this state by copy thereof
certified to by the executive director attached.
Sec. 8. The Attorney General of Nebraska shall designate an
assistant attorney general or assistant attorneys general, when requested
by the commission and directed by the Governor, and the services of such
assistant attorney general or assistant attorneys general shall be
-5-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
available to the commission whenever demanded. The compensation of such
assistant attorney general or assistant attorneys general as are assigned
to the commission shall be paid by the office of the Attorney General.
Sec. 9. The power to regulate all phases of retail sale of
consumable hemp products, except as specifically delegated in the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act, is vested exclusively in the
commission.
Sec. 10. The commission has the following powers, functions, and
duties:
(1) To receive applications for and to issue licenses to and
suspend, cancel, and revoke licenses of retailers in accordance with the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act;
(2) To call upon other administrative departments of the state,
county and municipal governments, county sheriffs, city police
departments, village marshals, peace officers, and prosecuting officers
for such information and assistance as the commission deems necessary in
the performance of its duties;
(3) To recommend to local governing bodies rules and regulations not
inconsistent with the law for the distribution and sale of consumable
hemp products throughout the state;
(4) To inspect or cause to be inspected any premises where
consumable hemp products are sold and, when sold on unlicensed premises
or on any premises in violation of law, to bring an action to enjoin the
use of the property for such purpose;
(5) To hear and determine appeals from orders of a local governing
body in accordance with the act;
(6) To conduct or cause to be conducted an audit to inspect any
licensee's records and books;
(7) In the conduct of any hearing or audit authorized to be held by
the commission (a) to examine or cause to be examined, under oath, any
licensee and to examine or cause to be examined the books and records of
-6-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
such licensee, (b) to hear testimony and take proof material for its
information in the discharge of its duties under the act, and (c) to
administer or cause to be administered oaths;
(8) To investigate the administration of laws in relation to
consumable hemp products in this and other states and to recommend to the
Governor and through the Governor to the Legislature amendments to the
act;
(9) To receive, account for, and remit to the State Treasurer state
license fees and taxes provided for in the act; and
(10) When the commission finds that the administration of the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act might be more efficiently and
economically conducted, the commission may require or allow for rounding
of all amounts on returns or reports, including amounts of tax. Amounts
shall be rounded to the nearest dollar with amounts ending in fifty cents
or more rounded to the next highest dollar.
Sec. 11. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act. The
rules and regulations may include, among such other things as the
commission may determine, provisions:
(1) Prescribing conditions as to the issuance of duplicate licenses
in lieu of those lost or destroyed;
(2) Determining for which violations of the rules and regulations
licenses shall be suspended, canceled, or revoked;
(3) Establishing standards of purity, sanitation, honest
advertising, and representation; and
(4) Covering any and all the other details which are necessary or
convenient to the enforcement of the intent, purpose, and requirements of
the act.
Sec. 12. (1) The commission shall provide without charge to any
licensee a set of rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission, a copy of the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act, and any
-7-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
other information which the commission deems important. The information
may be printed in a booklet, a pamphlet, provided electronically, or
provided in any other form the commission may determine to be
appropriate.
(2) The commission may update such material as often as it deems
necessary.
(3) The commission may provide such material to any other person
upon request and may charge a fee for the material. The fee shall be
reasonable and shall not exceed any reasonable or necessary costs of
producing the material for distribution.
Sec. 13. A local governing body shall have the following powers,
functions, and duties with respect to retail licenses within its
jurisdiction:
(1) To cancel or revoke for cause retail licenses, subject to the
right of appeal to the commission;
(2) To enter or to authorize any law enforcement officer to enter at
any time upon any licensed premises to determine whether any provision of
the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act, any rule or regulation adopted
and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance has been or is
being violated and at such time examine the premises of such licensee in
connection with such determination. Any law enforcement officer who
determines that any such violation has occurred or is occurring shall
report such violation in writing to the executive director of the
commission within thirty days after the latest of the following:
(a) Determining that such violation has occurred;
(b) The conclusion of an ongoing police investigation; or
(c) The verdict in a prosecution related to such an ongoing police
investigation if the prosecuting attorney determines that reporting such
violation prior to the verdict would jeopardize such prosecution;
(3) To receive a signed complaint from any resident within its
jurisdiction that any provision of the act, any rule or regulation
-8-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance relating to
consumable hemp products has been or is being violated and to act upon
such complaints in the manner provided in the act;
(4) To receive retail license fees and pay the same, after the
license has been delivered to the applicant, to the city, village, or
county treasurer;
(5) To examine or cause to be examined any applicant or any retail
licensee, upon whom notice of cancellation or revocation has been served
as provided in the act, to examine or cause to be examined the books and
records of any applicant or licensee, and to hear testimony and to take
proof for its information in the performance of its duties. For purposes
of obtaining any of the information desired, the local governing body may
authorize its agent or attorney to act on its behalf;
(6) To cancel or revoke on its own motion any license if, upon the
same notice and hearing as provided in section 44 of this act, it
determines that the licensee has violated any of the provisions of the
act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act,
or any ordinance relating to consumable hemp products. Such order of
cancellation or revocation may be appealed to the commission within
thirty days after the date of the order by filing a notice of appeal with
the commission. The commission shall handle the appeal in the manner
provided for hearing on an application in section 23 of this act; and
(7) To impose an occupation tax on licensees, subject to the limit
provided in section 21 of this act.
Sec. 14. (1) Local governing bodies shall only have authority to
approve applications and deny licenses pursuant to the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act.
(2) The governing bodies of cities and villages are authorized to
regulate by ordinance, not inconsistent with the Nebraska Consumable Hemp
Control Act, the business of all retail licensees carried on within the
corporate limits of the city or village.
-9-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
Sec. 15. The commission and local governing bodies shall cause
frequent inspection to be made on the premises of all licensees. If it is
found that any such licensee is violating any provision of the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act or the rules and regulations of the
commission adopted and promulgated under the act or is failing to observe
in good faith the purposes of the act, the license may be suspended,
canceled, or revoked after the licensee is given notice and an
opportunity to be heard.
Sec. 16. (1) In the discharge of any duty under the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act the commission may issue subpoenas and compel
the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books,
accounts, documents, and testimony.
(2) In case of disobedience on the part of any person to any
subpoena issued by the commission or the refusal of any witness to
testify on any matters regarding which such witness may be lawfully
interrogated, it shall be the duty of the district court for the county
in which such hearing was convened, on the application of a member of the
commission, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the
case of disobedience to the requirements of a subpoena issued from such
court or a refusal to testify therein.
Sec. 17. (1) The commission may issue a retailer license to any
person to sell and offer for sale at retail either in the original
package or otherwise, as prescribed in the retail license, on the
premises specified in the retail license, any consumable hemp product.
This shall not authorize resale in any form.
(2) An applicant for a license shall submit an application to the
commission in a form and manner prescribed by the commission. The
application shall contain:
(a) The name and residence of the applicant and how long the
applicant has resided within the State of Nebraska;
(b) The particular premises for which a license is desired
-10-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
designating the same by street and number if practicable or, if not, by
such other description as definitely locates the premises;
(c) The name of the owner of the premises upon which the business
licensed is to be carried on;
(d)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(d)(ii) of this section,
a statement that the applicant is a resident of Nebraska and legally able
to work in Nebraska, that the applicant and the spouse of the applicant
are not less than twenty-one years of age, and that such applicant has
never been convicted of a covered offense.
(ii) The manager of a corporation applying for a license shall
comply with subdivision (2)(d)(i) of this section as though the manager
were the applicant, except that such subdivision shall not apply to the
spouse of the manager-applicant;
(e) A statement that the applicant intends to carry on the business
authorized by the license for the applicant and not as the agent of any
other persons and that, if licensed, the applicant will carry on such
business for the applicant and not as the agent for any other person;
(f) A statement that the applicant intends to superintend in person
the management of the business licensed and that, if so licensed, the
applicant will superintend in person the management of the business; and
(g) Such other information as the commission may from time to time
direct.
(3) The applicant shall also submit two legible sets of fingerprints
to be furnished to the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the
Nebraska State Patrol for a national criminal history record check and
the fee for such record check payable to the patrol.
(4) The application for initial issuance shall also be accompanied
by the following fees:
(a) A licensing fee of five hundred dollars which shall be returned
if the application is denied; and
(b) A nonrefundable application fee of four hundred dollars.
-11-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(5) If any false statement is made in any part of such application,
the applicant shall be deemed guilty of perjury, and upon conviction
thereof the license shall be denied or revoked and the applicant
subjected to the penalties provided by law for that crime.
(6) The license year shall commence on May 1 of each year and shall
end on the following April 30.
(7) A licensee may renew a license by filing with the commission an
application and the following fees:
(a) A licensing fee of five hundred dollars which shall be returned
if the application is denied; and
(b) A nonrefundable application fee of forty-five dollars.
(8) The applicant shall pay any licensing fee required by this
section:
(a) In the case of a premises located inside the corporate limits of
a city or village, directly to the city or village treasurer; and
(b) In the case of premises located outside the corporate limits of
a city or village, directly to the county treasurer.
(9) When delivering any type of license under the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act to a licensee, the commission may use mail or
electronic delivery.
Sec. 18. (1) The commission shall not issue a license to, or renew
a license for, any individual who:
(a) Is not a resident of Nebraska;
(b) Is not of good character and reputation in the community in
which such person resides;
(c) Is not lawfully able to work in Nebraska;
(d) Has been convicted of a covered offense, unless such individual
has received a pardon for such offense;
(e) Has had a license issued under the Nebraska Consumable Hemp
Control Act revoked for cause;
(f) Except as provided in this subdivision, is the spouse of an
-12-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
individual who is ineligible under this section to receive and hold a
license. Such applicant shall become eligible for a license only if the
commission finds from the evidence that the public interest will not be
infringed upon if such license is granted. It shall be prima facie
evidence that when a spouse is ineligible to receive a license the
applicant is also ineligible to receive a license. Such prima facie
evidence shall be overcome if it is shown to the satisfaction of the
commission (a) that the licensed business will be the sole property of
the applicant and (b) that such licensed premises will be properly
operated;
(g) Is a law enforcement officer; or
(h) Is younger than twenty-one years of age.
(2) The commission shall not issue a license to, or renew a license
for:
(a) A partnership unless one of the partners is a resident of
Nebraska and unless all the members of such partnership are otherwise
qualified to obtain a license;
(b) A limited liability company, if any officer or director of the
limited liability company or any member having an ownership interest in
the aggregate of more than twenty-five percent of such company would be
ineligible to receive a license under this section for any reason other
than the reasons stated in subdivisions (1)(a) and (c) of this section,
or if a manager of a limited liability company licensee would be
ineligible to receive a license under this section for any reason;
(c) A corporation, if any officer or director of the corporation or
any stockholder owning in the aggregate more than twenty-five percent of
the stock of such corporation would be ineligible to receive a license
under this section for any reason other than the reasons stated in
subdivisions (1)(a) and (c) of this section, or if a manager of a
corporate licensee would be ineligible to receive a license under this
section for any reason; or
-13-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(d) A corporation, unless such corporation is duly registered with
the Secretary of State to transact business in this state. If such
corporation is owned by a corporation, the owning corporation shall also
be duly registered with the Secretary of State to transact business in
this state.
(3) The commission shall not issue a license to, or renew a license
for a person:
(a) Whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent
unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required
of the licensee; or
(b) Who does not own the premises for which a license is sought or
does not have a lease or combination of leases on such premises for the
full period for which the license is to be issued.
(4) When a trustee is the licensee, the beneficiary or beneficiaries
of the trust shall comply with the requirements of this section, but
nothing in this section shall prohibit any such beneficiary from being a
minor or a person who is mentally incompetent.
Sec. 19. (1) A retail license shall apply only to that part of the
premises described in the application approved by the commission and in
the license issued on the application.
(2) After such license has been granted for the particular premises,
the commission, with the approval of the local governing body and upon
proper showing, may endorse upon the license permission to add to, delete
from, or abandon the premises described in such license and, if
applicable, to move from the premises to other premises approved by the
local governing body. In order to obtain such approval, the licensee
shall file with the local governing body a written request and a
statement under oath which shows that the premises, as added to or
deleted from or to which such move is to be made, comply in all respects
with the requirements of the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act. No
such addition, deletion, or move shall be made by any such licensee until
-14-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
the license has been endorsed to that effect in writing by the local
governing body and by the commission and the licensee furnishes proof of
payment of the renewal fee prescribed in section 17 of this act.
Sec. 20. Upon receiving an application for a license, the
commission shall notify the clerk of the city or village in which such
license is sought or, if the license sought is not sought within a city
or village, the county clerk of the county in which such license is
sought, of the receipt of the application and shall include one copy of
the application with the notice. No such license shall be issued or
denied by the commission until the expiration of the time allowed for the
receipt of a recommendation of denial or a resident objection requiring a
hearing under subsection (1) or (2) of section 23 of this act. During the
period of forty-five days after the date of receipt by mail or electronic
delivery of such application from the commission, the local governing
body of such city, village, or county may make and submit to the
commission recommendations relative to the granting or denial of such
license to the applicant.
Sec. 21. (1) If no hearing is required pursuant to subsection (1)
or (2) of section 23 of this act and the commission has no objections
pursuant to subsection (3) of such section, the commission may waive the
forty-five-day objection period and, if not otherwise prohibited by law,
cause a retail license to be signed by its chairperson, attested by its
executive director over the seal of the commission, and issued in the
manner provided in subsection (4) of this section as a matter of course.
(2) A retail license may be issued to any qualified applicant if the
commission finds that:
(a) The applicant is fit, willing, and able to properly provide the
service proposed within the city, village, or county where the premises
described in the application are located;
(b) The applicant can conform to all provisions and requirements of
and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the Nebraska Consumable
-15-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
Hemp Control Act;
(c) The applicant has demonstrated that the type of management and
control to be exercised over the premises described in the application
will be sufficient to ensure that the licensed business can conform to
all provisions and requirements of and rules and regulations adopted
pursuant to the act; and
(d) The issuance of the license is or will be required by the
present or future public convenience and necessity.
(3) In making its determination pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the commission shall consider:
(a) Any recommendation of the local governing body;
(b) Any resident objection made in accordance with section 23 of
this act;
(c) The existing population of the city, village, or county and its
projected growth;
(d) The nature of the neighborhood or community of the location of
the proposed licensed premises;
(e) The existence or absence of other retail licensees within the
neighborhood or community of the location of the proposed licensed
premises and whether, as evidenced by substantive, corroborative
documentation, the issuance of such license would result in or add to an
undue concentration of licenses;
(f) The existing motor vehicle and pedestrian traffic flow in the
vicinity of the proposed licensed premises;
(g) The adequacy of existing law enforcement;
(h) Zoning restrictions;
(i) The sanitation or sanitary conditions on or about the proposed
licensed premises; and
(j) Whether the type of business or activity proposed to be operated
in conjunction with the proposed license is and will be consistent with
the public interest.
-16-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(4) Retail licenses issued or renewed by the commission shall be
mailed or delivered electronically to:
(a) The clerk of the city, village, or county who shall deliver the
same to the licensee upon receipt from the licensee of proof of payment
of:
(i) The license fee;
(ii) Any fee for publication of notice of hearing before the local
governing body upon the application for the license;
(iii) The fee for publication of notice of renewal as provided in
section 26 of this act; and
(iv) Occupation taxes, if any, imposed by such city, village, or
county; or
(b) The licensee, upon confirmation from the clerk of the city,
village, or county that the necessary fees and taxes described in
subdivision (4)(a) of this section have been received.
(5) Notwithstanding any ordinance or charter power to the contrary,
no city, village, or county shall impose an occupation tax on the
business of any person, firm, or corporation licensed under the act and
doing business within the corporate limits of such city or village or
within the boundaries of such county in an amount which exceeds twenty
percent of the excise tax imposed pursuant to section 51 of this act.
(6) Each license shall designate the name of the licensee, the place
of business licensed, and the type of license issued.
Sec. 22. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, no retail license shall be issued for a premises
located within one hundred fifty feet of any church, school, hospital, or
home for indigent persons or for veterans and their spouses or children.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) An established retail business selling consumable hemp products
that was in operation and selling consumable hemp products prior to the
effective date of this act; or
-17-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(b) To a retail licensee in operation before any such church,
school, hospital, or home was established in such location.
(3) If a proposed location for a retail license is within one
hundred fifty feet of any church, a license may be issued if the
commission gives notice to the affected church and holds a hearing as
prescribed in section 23 of this act if the affected church submits a
written request for a hearing.
Sec. 23. (1) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application
for a retail license if, within forty-five days after the date the
application was received by the city, village, or county clerk, the
commission receives a recommendation of denial from the city, village, or
county.
(2)(a) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application for a
retail license if it receives written objections from at least three
persons residing in the city, village, or county where the licensed
premises will be located and such objections are received by the
commission within the following deadlines:
(i) If the city, village, or county provides the commission with a
recommendation that the application be granted, the objections must be
received no later than ten days after the commission receives such
recommendation; or
(ii) In all other cases, the objections must be received no later
than forty-five days after the date the city, village, or county clerk
received the application.
(b) The commission may conduct a hearing even though a resident
objection has been withdrawn. In such case the commission may conduct the
hearing based upon the objection as originally filed and may make
independent findings as to whether the license should be issued.
(3) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application for a
retail license if, within forty-five days after the date the application
was received by the city, village, or county clerk, the commission itself
-18-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
objects to the issuance of the license or receives an objection from any
employee of the commission.
(4) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application for a
retail license if the application indicates that the licensed premises
will be within one hundred fifty feet of a church as described in section
22 of this act and, within forty-five days after the date the application
was received by the city, village, or county clerk, the commission
receives a written request by the church for a hearing.
(5)(a) Hearings upon such applications shall be conducted as
provided in this subsection.
(b) At least fifteen days prior to such hearing, the commission
shall by mail or electronic delivery provide notice indicating the time
and place of such hearing to the applicant, the local governing body,
each resident objector, and any church described in subsection (4) of
this section that has requested a hearing. The notice shall state that
the commission will receive evidence for the purpose of determining
whether to approve or deny the application. Mailing or electronic
delivery to the attorney of record of a party shall be deemed to fulfill
the purposes of this section.
(c) The commission may receive evidence, including testimony and
documentary evidence, and may hear and question witnesses concerning the
application.
(d) The commission shall not use electronic delivery with respect to
an applicant, an objector, or a church under this section without the
consent of the recipient.
Sec. 24. (1) When a local governing body receives from the
commission the notice and copy of application as provided in section 20
of this act for a retail license within the jurisdiction of the local
governing body, the local governing body may fix a time and place for a
hearing at which the local governing body shall receive evidence, either
orally or by affidavit from the applicant and any other person, bearing
-19-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
upon the propriety of the issuance of a license.
(2) Notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be published
in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city, village,
or county one time not less than seven and not more than fourteen days
before the time of the hearing.
(3) Such notice shall include, but not be limited to, a statement
that all persons desiring to give evidence before the local governing
body in support of or in opposition to issuance of such license may do so
at the time of the hearing.
(4) Such hearing shall be held not more than forty-five days after
the date of receipt of the notice from the commission, and after such
hearing the local governing body shall cause to be recorded in the minute
record of their proceedings a resolution recommending either issuance or
denial of such license.
(5) The clerk of such city, village, or county shall mail to the
commission by first-class mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the resolution
which shall state the cost of the published notice, except that failure
to comply with this provision shall not void any license issued by the
commission.
(6) If the commission refuses to issue such a license, the cost of
publication of notice shall be paid by the commission from the security
for costs.
Sec. 25. (1)(a) A retail license issued by the commission and
outstanding may be automatically renewed by the commission without formal
application upon payment of the renewal fee and license fee if payable to
the commission prior to or within thirty days after the expiration of the
license. The payment shall be an affirmative representation and
certification by the licensee that all answers contained in an
application, if submitted, would be the same in all material respects as
the answers contained in the last previous application.
(b) The renewal privilege provided for in this section shall not be
-20-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
construed as a vested right and shall not prevent the commission from
decreasing the number of licenses.
(2)(a) The commission may renew the license if the licensee is
qualified to receive a license, the location of the licensed premises has
not changed, and the licensed premises remain suitable to be used as
such.
(b) The commission may also at any time require a licensee to submit
an application.
(c) Upon written request by the local governing body, the commission
shall require a licensee to submit an application.
(3) If a licensee files an application form upon seeking renewal of
his or her license, the application shall be processed as set forth in
section 20 of this act.
Sec. 26. The city, village, or county clerk shall cause to be
published in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city,
village, or county, one time between January 10 and January 30 of each
year, individual notice of the right of automatic renewal of each retail
license. The notice shall be in substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF RENEWAL OF CONSUMABLE HEMP PRODUCTS RETAIL LICENSE
Notice is hereby given pursuant to section 26 of this act that a
consumable hemp products retail license may be automatically renewed for
one year from May 1, 20...., for the following retail licensee:
(Name of Licensee) (Address of licensed premises)
Notice is hereby given that written objections to the issuance of
automatic renewal of license may be filed by any resident of the city
(village or county) on or before February 10, 20...., in the office of
the (city, village, or county) clerk. If written objections are filed by
at least three residents, the commission will hold a hearing to determine
whether the license should be renewed.
(Name)
(City, village, or county) Clerk
-21-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
Sec. 27. Upon the conclusion of any renewal hearing required by
section 26 of this act, the local governing body may request a licensee
to submit an application as provided in section 25 of this act.
Sec. 28. (1) The city or village treasurer shall credit any retail
license fees received by the city or village to the school fund of the
district lying wholly or partially within the corporate limits of such
city or village.
(2) The county treasurer shall credit any retail license fees
received by the county to the school fund of the county.
(3) The commission shall distribute civil penalties and license fees
received by the commission to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 29. (1) A license issued under the Nebraska Consumable Hemp
Control Act terminates immediately upon the sale of the licensed premises
named in such license. The purchaser or transferee may submit an
application for a license prior to closing such sale or transfer. While
such application is pending, the purchaser may request and obtain a
temporary operating permit from the commission which shall authorize the
purchaser to continue the business which was conducted on the purchased
premises under the terms and conditions of the terminated license for
ninety days or until the purchaser has obtained a license in the
purchaser's own name, whichever occurs sooner.
(2) In the absence of such temporary operating permit, the purchaser
shall not store or sell consumable hemp products on the premises until
the purchaser has obtained a license in the purchaser's own name.
(3) If the application is withdrawn by the applicant or is denied by
the commission, the previous license may be reinstated at the discretion
of the commission upon request by the previous licensee.
Sec. 30. (1) A retail license shall be purely a personal privilege,
valid for one year after issuance unless sooner revoked as provided in
the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act.
-22-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(2) A retail license shall not:
(a) Constitute property;
(b) Be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution;
(c) Be alienable or transferable, voluntarily or involuntarily; or
(d) Be subject to being encumbered or hypothecated.
(3) A license shall not descend by the laws of testate or intestate
devolution, but it shall cease upon the death of the licensee, except
that:
(a) Executors or administrators of the estate of any deceased
licensee, when such estate consists in part of consumable hemp products,
or a partnership or limited liability company upon the death of one or
more of the partners or members, may continue the business of the sale of
consumable hemp products under order of the appropriate court and may
exercise the privileges of the deceased or deceased partner or member
after the death of such decedent until the expiration of such license,
but if such license would have expired within two months following the
death of the licensee, the license may be renewed by the administrators
or executors with the approval of the appropriate court for a period not
to exceed one additional year; and
(b) When a license is issued to spouses, as co-licensees with rights
of survivorship, upon the death of one spouse the survivor may exercise
all rights and privileges under such license in the survivor's own name.
(4) The trustee of any insolvent or bankrupt licensee, when such
estate consists in part of consumable hemp products, may continue the
business of the sale of consumable hemp products under order of the
appropriate court and may exercise the privileges of the insolvent or
bankrupt licensee until the expiration of such license.
Sec. 31. (1) A consumable hemp product sold in this state shall:
(a) Satisfy the child-resistant effectiveness standards under 16
C.F.R. 1700.15(b)(1) when tested in accordance with the requirements of
16 C.F.R. 1700.20; and
-23-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(b) Be labeled with consumer protection warnings in the form of
statements that cover all of the following:
(i) A listing of the major cannabinoids in the product;
(ii) A listing of ingredients and possible allergens and a
nutritional fact panel for edible products or a code that can be scanned
that directs consumers to a website containing the list of ingredients
and possible allergens and a nutritional fact panel;
(iii) A statement that consumption of certain cannabinoids may
impair your ability to drive and operate heavy machinery;
(iv) A statement that the product is not approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(v) A statement to keep out of reach of children;
(vi) The total amount of hemp-derived cannabinoids in the entire
package; measured in milligrams for edible products;
(vii) The recommended serving sizes for edible products;
(viii) The net weight of the product; and
(ix) A code that can be scanned to access a certificate of analysis.
(2) A licensee shall only sell consumable hemp products that are
obtained from a manufacturer or distributor that uses or contracts with
an independent testing laboratory that tests such products to ensure
compliance with section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act
of 2018, Public Law 115-334, and any regulations adopted and promulgated
under such section, as such section, act, and regulations existed on
January 1, 2025.
Sec. 32. (1) A licensee shall display at all times in a prominent
place a printed card with a minimum height of twenty inches and a width
of fourteen inches, with each letter to be a minimum of one-fourth inch
in height, which shall read as follows:
WARNING TO PERSONS UNDER 21: It is a crime for a person younger than
21 years of age to consume, purchase, attempt to purchase, or possess any
consumable hemp product. Violation of this law may result in a fine of up
-24-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
to $500, 3 months in jail, or both. Your parents or guardian will be
notified of this violation.
WARNING TO ADULTS: It is a crime to provide consumable hemp products
to a person younger than 21 years of age. Violation of this law may
result in a fine of up to $1000, 6 months in jail, or both.
(2) The commission may provide such warning signs to licensees by
electronic delivery.
Sec. 33. To establish proof of age for the purpose of purchasing
consumable hemp products, a person shall present or display only a valid
identification document.
Sec. 34. (1) No person shall knowingly sell, furnish, give away,
exchange, or deliver, or permit the sale, gift, or procuring of, any
consumable hemp product to a minor.
(2) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this section if
the minor was a purchaser who provided a licensee with an identification
document showing the purchaser to be of age and bearing a physical
description or depiction reasonably describing or depicting the
purchaser.
(3) A violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor unless the
violator is also a minor, in which case it is a Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 35. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a minor shall not obtain, or attempt to obtain, consumable hemp products
by misrepresenting such minor's age or by any other method. A violation
of this subsection is a Class III misdemeanor.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no minor
may sell, dispense, consume, or have in such minor's possession or
physical control any consumable hemp product. Except as provided in
section 28-1701, a violation of this subsection is a Class III
misdemeanor.
(3) An individual who is at least nineteen years of age may be
employed by a retail licensee.
-25-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
Sec. 36. A local governing body may enact ordinances to regulate,
suppress, control, and penalize the transportation, consumption, or
knowing possession of consumable hemp products by minors.
Sec. 37. A parent or guardian of a minor shall not knowingly suffer
or permit such minor to violate section 35 of this act. A violation of
this section is a Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 38. A person shall not knowingly manufacture, create, or alter
any form of identification to falsely represent a person's age for the
purpose of selling or delivering such identification to a minor. A
violation of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.
Sec. 39. When a minor is arrested for a violation of section 35 or
38 of this act, the law enforcement agency employing the arresting peace
officer shall make a reasonable attempt to notify such minor's parent or
guardian of the arrest.
Sec. 40. (1) A person shall not:
(a) Sell consumable hemp products at retail without a valid retail
license under the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act; or
(b) Make any false statement or otherwise violates any of the
provisions of the act in obtaining any license under the act.
(2) A licensee shall not violate any provision of the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act with respect to the possession, distribution,
or sale of consumable hemp products or with respect to the maintenance of
the licensed premises.
(3) A violation of this section or of any provision of the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act for which a penalty is not otherwise provided
shall be a Class IV misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class II
misdemeanor for any subsequent offense.
(4) Each day any person engages in business as a retailer in
violation of the act shall constitute a separate offense.
(5) In any prosecution in which a person is charged with an offense
arising out of the failure to obtain a valid license, the fact that such
-26-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
person failed to produce such license upon demand is prima facie proof
that the commission has not issued a license to such person.
Sec. 41. Any licensee who permits, assents, or is a party in any
way to any violation or infringement of the Nebraska Consumable Hemp
Control Act shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the act. Any money
loaned contrary to a provision of the act shall not be recovered back.
Any note, mortgage, or other evidence of indebtedness, any security, or
any lease or contract obtained or made contrary to the act shall be
unenforceable and void.
Sec. 42. If the owner of the licensed premises or any person from
whom the licensee derives the right to possession of such premises, or
the agent of such owner or person, knowingly permits the licensee to use
such licensed premises in violation of the terms of the Nebraska
Consumable Hemp Control Act, such owner, agent, or other person shall be
deemed guilty of a violation of the act to the same extent as such
licensee and be subject to the same punishment.
Sec. 43. Every act or omission of whatsoever nature constituting a
violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Consumable Hemp
Control Act by any officer, director, manager, or other agent or employee
of any licensee, if such act is committed or omission is made with the
authorization, knowledge, or approval of the licensee, shall be deemed
and held to be the act of such employer or licensee, and such employer or
licensee shall be punishable in the same manner as if such act or
omission had been done or omitted by him or her personally.
Sec. 44. (1) Any five residents of a city or village shall have the
right to file a complaint with the local governing body of such city or
village stating that any retail licensee subject to the jurisdiction of
such local governing body has been or is violating any provision of the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act or the rules or regulations adopted
and promulgated pursuant to the act.
(2) Such complaint shall be in writing in the form prescribed by the
-27-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
local governing body and shall be signed and sworn to by the parties
complaining. The complaint shall state the particular provision, rule, or
regulation believed to have been violated and the facts in detail upon
which belief is based.
(3) If the local governing body is satisfied that the complaint
substantially charges a violation and that from the facts alleged there
is reasonable cause for such belief, it shall set the matter for hearing
within ten days after the date of the filing of the complaint and shall
serve notice upon the licensee of the time and place of such hearing and
of the particular charge in the complaint.
(4) The complaint shall in all cases be disposed of by the local
governing body within thirty days after the date the complaint was filed
by resolution thereof, which resolution shall be deemed the final order
for purposes of appeal to the commission as provided in section 46 of
this act.
Sec. 45. (1) The commission may, after notice and hearing, suspend,
cancel, or revoke the license of any person who violates:
(a) The Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act;
(b) Any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission; or
(c) Any lawful ordinance of the local governing body relating to
consumable hemp products.
(2) If any licensee is convicted of a violation of the act, the
court shall immediately notify the local governing body and the
commission.
Sec. 46. (1) A copy of the rule, regulation, order, or decision of
the commission denying an application or suspending, canceling, or
revoking a license or of any notice required by any proceeding before it,
certified under the seal of the commission, shall be served upon each
party of record to the proceeding before the commission. Service upon any
attorney of record for any such party shall be deemed to be service upon
-28-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
such party. Each party appearing before the commission shall enter an
appearance and indicate to the commission such person's address for such
service. The mailing of a copy of any rule, regulation, order, or
decision of the commission or of any notice by the commission, in the
proceeding, to such party at such address shall be deemed to be service
upon such party.
(2) Within thirty days after the service of any rule, regulation,
order, or decision of the commission denying an application or
suspending, canceling, or revoking any license upon any party to the
proceeding, as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, such party
may apply for a rehearing with respect to any matters determined by the
commission. The commission shall receive and consider such application
for a rehearing within thirty days after its filing with the executive
director of the commission. If such application for rehearing is granted,
the commission shall proceed as promptly as possible to consider the
matters presented by such application. No appeal shall be allowed from
any decision of the commission except as provided in section 47 of this
act.
(3) Upon final disposition of any proceeding, costs shall be paid by
the party or parties against whom a final decision is rendered. Costs may
be taxed or retaxed to local governing bodies as well as individuals.
Only one rehearing referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be
granted by the commission on application of any one party.
(4) For purposes of this section, party of record means:
(a) In the case of an administrative proceeding before the
commission on the application for a retail license:
(i) The applicant;
(ii) Each individual protesting the issuance of such license
pursuant to subsection (2) of section 23 of this act;
(iii) The local governing body if it is entering an appearance to
protest the issuance of the license or if it is requesting a hearing; and
-29-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(iv) The commission;
(b) In the case of an administrative proceeding before a local
governing body to cancel or revoke a retail license:
(i) The licensee; and
(ii) The local governing body; and
(c) In the case of an administrative proceeding before the
commission to suspend, cancel, or revoke a retail license:
(i) The licensee; and
(ii) The commission.
Sec. 47. Any order or decision of the commission granting, denying,
suspending, canceling, revoking, or renewing or refusing to suspend,
cancel, revoke, or renew a license may be appealed, and the appeal shall
be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 48. (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the commission shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing programs which
provide training for persons employed in the sale of consumable hemp
products and the management of licensed premises. Such rules and
regulations may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Minimum standards governing training of sales personnel,
including standards and requirements governing curriculum, program
trainers, and certification requirements;
(b) Minimum standards governing training in management of licensed
premises, including standards and requirements governing curriculum,
program trainers, and certification requirements;
(c) Minimum standards governing the methods allowed for training
programs which may include the Internet, interactive video, live training
in various locations across the state, and other means deemed appropriate
by the commission;
(d) Setting enrollment fees. Such fees shall be in an amount
determined by the commission to be necessary to cover the administrative
costs, including salary and benefits, of enrolling in a training program
-30-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
offered by the commission pursuant to subsection (2) of this section but
shall not exceed thirty dollars; and
(e) Procedures and fees for certification. Such fees shall be in an
amount determined by the commission to be sufficient to defray the
administrative costs, including salary and benefits, associated with
maintaining a list of persons certified under this section and issuing
proof of certification to eligible individuals but shall not exceed
twenty dollars.
(2) The commission may create a program to provide training for
persons employed in the sale of consumable hemp products and management
of licensed premises. The program shall include training on the issues of
sales of consumable hemp products to minors. The commission may charge
each person enrolling in the program an enrollment fee as provided in the
rules and regulations, but such fee shall not exceed thirty dollars. All
such fees shall be collected by the commission and remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Commission
Cash Fund.
(3) A person who has completed a training program which complies
with the rules and regulations, whether such program is offered by the
commission or by another organization, may become certified by the
commission upon the commission receiving evidence that he or she has
completed such program and the person seeking certification paying the
certification fee established under this section.
Sec. 49. Any money collected by the commission pursuant to section
48 of this act shall be credited to the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control
Commission Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. The purpose of the
fund shall be to cover any administrative costs, including salary and
benefits, incurred by the commission in carrying out section 48 of this
act and to defray the costs associated with electronic regulatory
transactions, industry education events, enforcement training, and
equipment for regulatory work. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
-31-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Commission Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 50. For purposes of sections 50 to 55 of this act:
(1) Affiliated means entities that are owned or controlled by the
same or related interests;
(2) Average market rate means the average price, as determined by
the commission on a quarterly basis, of all consumable hemp products that
are sold or transferred from distributors to retail licensees in this
state, less taxes paid on the sales or transfers;
(3) Contract price means the invoice price charged by a distributor
to each retail licensee for each sale or transfer of consumable hemp
products, exclusive of any tax that is included in the written invoice
price, and exclusive of any discount or other reduction. In the case of
multiple invoices reflecting multiple prices for the same transaction,
contract price is the highest such price;
(4) Distributor means any person, other than a retail licensee,
selling or transferring consumable hemp products to a retail licensee,
and includes, but is not limited to, distributors, manufacturers,
producers, and wholesalers;
(5) Excise tax means the tax imposed by section 51 of this act; and
(6) Related interests includes individuals who are related by blood
or marriage or entities that are directly or indirectly controlled by an
entity or individual or related individuals.
Sec. 51. (1) There is levied and shall be collected an excise tax
on the first sale or transfer of consumable hemp products by a
distributor to a retail licensee. The tax shall be at a rate of three
percent of:
(a) The average market rate of the consumable hemp products if the
-32-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
transaction is between affiliated licensees; or
(b) The contract price for consumable hemp products if the
transaction is between unaffiliated licensees.
(2) The excise tax imposed by this section shall be in addition to
all other occupation or privilege taxes imposed by this state or by any
political subdivision of the state, subject to section 21 of this act.
Sec. 52. (1) Every retail licensee shall keep at each licensed
premises complete and accurate electronic records for that licensed
premises, including itemized invoices of all consumable hemp products
purchased by such licensee.
(2) The records required by subsection (1) of this section shall
include the inventory of all consumable hemp products on hand and any
other pertinent papers and documents relating to the sale or transfer of
consumable hemp products as the commission may by rule and regulation
require.
(3) The licensee shall provide a copy of such records to the
commission if so requested. The commission may establish the acceptable
form of such records.
Sec. 53. (1) Every retail licensee shall file a return with the
commission by the twentieth day of the month following the month reported
and with the report shall remit the amount of excise tax due.
(2) The return, which shall be upon forms prescribed and furnished
by the commission, shall contain, among other things, the total amount of
consumable hemp products purchased or transferred during the preceding
month from a distributor and the amount of tax due thereon.
(3) The commission may require licensees to file tax returns
electronically and to remit payments due by electronic funds transfers.
Sec. 54. The commission shall collect the excise tax and shall
account for and remit to the State Treasurer at least once each month all
money collected pursuant to such tax for credit to the General Fund.
Sec. 55. It shall be unlawful for any person to evade or attempt to
-33-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
evade the payment of the excise tax. A violation of this section is a
Class II misdemeanor and the violator shall forfeit and pay, as a part of
costs in such action, double the amount of the tax so evaded or attempted
to be evaded.
Sec. 56. Section 28-1701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1701 (1) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an
eligible alcohol or drug offense if such person witnessed or was the
victim of a sexual assault and such person:
(a) Either:
(i) In good faith, reported such sexual assault to law enforcement;
or
(ii) Requested emergency medical assistance for the victim of the
sexual assault; and
(b) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the eligible
alcohol or drug offense was obtained or discovered as a result of such
person reporting such sexual assault to law enforcement or requesting
emergency medical assistance.
(2) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an eligible
alcohol or drug offense if:
(a) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the person for
the offense was obtained or discovered as a result of the investigation
or prosecution of a sexual assault; and
(b) Such person cooperates with law enforcement in the investigation
or prosecution of the sexual assault.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible alcohol or drug offense means:
(i) A violation of subsection (3) or (13) of section 28-416 or of
section 28-441;
(ii) A violation of section 53-180.02 committed by a person older
than eighteen years of age and under the age of twenty-one years, as
-34-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
described in subdivision (4)(a) of section 53-180.05;
(iii) A violation of subsection (2) of section 35 of this act;
(iv) (iii) A violation of a city or village ordinance similar to
subdivision (3)(a)(i), or (ii), or (iii) of this section; or
(v) (iv) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses in subdivision (3)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii), or
(iv) of this section as the underlying offense; and
(b) Sexual assault means:
(i) A violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04,
28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-1463.03, sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a
minor under section 28-831, or subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section
28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section 28-707; or
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses listed in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section
as the underlying offense.
Sec. 57. Section 53-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-105 There is hereby created the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission, consisting of three members to be appointed by the Governor,
subject to confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the
Legislature, no more than two of whom shall be members of the same
political party, and no two shall be citizens of the same congressional
district. The members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission shall
also serve as the members of the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control
Commission as provided in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 58. Section 53-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-106 The Governor shall appoint three members of the commission,
-35-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
one of whom he shall designate as chairman. One member shall be appointed
every two years and shall hold office for a period of six years. Any
appointee may be removed by the Governor, after an opportunity to be
heard, for malfeasance, misfeasance or neglect in office. No person shall
be appointed to the commission, or continue to hold that office after
appointment, while holding any other office or position under the laws of
this state, any other state, or of the United States, except that the
commissioners shall also serve as the members of the Nebraska Consumable
Hemp Control Commission as provided in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 59. Section 53-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-110 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Commission means the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission and the
Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Commission;
(b) Consumable hemp product has the same meaning as in section 3 of
this act;
(c) Conviction includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction
following a plea of nolo contendere, payment of a fine or penalty in
settlement of any prosecution, or forfeiture of a bond to appear in court
to answer charges;
(d) Covered offense means:
(i) A felony; or
(ii) A violation of any federal or state law concerning the
manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor, consumable hemp products, or
marijuana; and
(e) Marijuana has the same meaning as in section 28-401.
(2) (1) No person shall be appointed as a commissioner, the
executive director of the commission, or an employee of the commission
who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not resided within
the State of Nebraska successively for two years next preceding the date
of his or her appointment.
-36-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
(3) (2) No person (a) convicted of a covered offense or who has
pleaded guilty to a felony or any violation of any federal or state law
concerning the manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor prior or
subsequent to the passage of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, (b) who has
paid a fine or penalty in settlement of any prosecution against him or
her for any violation of such laws, or (c) who has forfeited his or her
bond to appear in court to answer charges for any such violation shall be
appointed commissioner.
(4)(a) (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of
this subsection, a no commissioner or employee of the commission shall
not may, directly or indirectly, individually, as a member of a
partnership, as a member of a limited liability company, or as a
shareholder of a corporation: , have
(i) Have any interest whatsoever in the manufacture, sale, or
distribution of alcoholic liquor or consumable hemp products; ,
(ii) Receive receive any compensation or profit from such
manufacture, sale, or distribution; ,
(iii) Have or have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales
made by the persons authorized by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act act to
purchase or to sell alcoholic liquor; or .
(iv) Have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales made by
the persons authorized by the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act to
purchase or to sell consumable hemp products.
(b) With the written approval of the executive director, an employee
of the commission, other than the executive director or a division
manager, may accept part-time or seasonal employment with a person
licensed or regulated by the commission. No such employment shall be
approved if the licensee receives more than fifty percent of the
licensee's gross revenue from the sale or dispensing of alcoholic liquor
or consumable hemp products.
(5) (4) This section shall not prevent any commissioner, the
-37-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
executive director, or any employee from purchasing and keeping in his or
her possession for the use of himself, herself, or members of his or her
family or guests any:
(a) Alcoholic alcoholic liquor which may be purchased or kept by any
person pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act; or act.
(b) Consumable hemp products which may be purchased or kept by any
person pursuant to the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Act.
Sec. 60. Section 53-111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-111 (1) A commissioner, the executive director of the commission,
or any person appointed or employed by the commission shall not solicit
or accept any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment from any person
subject to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or the Nebraska Consumable
Hemp Control Act or from any officer, agent, or employee thereof or
solicit, request from, or recommend, directly or indirectly, to any such
person or to any officer, agent, or employee thereof the appointment of
any person to any place or position. Any such person and every officer,
agent, or employee thereof may not offer to any commissioner, the
executive director, or any person appointed or employed by the commission
any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment. If a commissioner, the
executive director, or any person appointed or employed by the commission
violates this section, he or she shall be removed from his or her office
or employment. Every person violating this section shall be guilty of a
Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 61. Section 81-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1021 (1) All motor vehicles acquired by the State of Nebraska
except any vehicle rented as a bureau fleet vehicle shall be indelibly
and conspicuously lettered, in plain letters of a contrasting color or
reflective material:
(a) On each side thereof with the words State of Nebraska and
-38-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
following such words the name of whatever board, department, bureau,
division, institution, including the University of Nebraska or state
college, office, or other state expending agency of the state to which
the motor vehicle belongs; and
(b) On the back thereof with the words State of Nebraska.
(2) This section shall not apply to motor vehicles used or
controlled by:
(a) The Nebraska State Patrol, the Public Service Commission, the
Game and Parks Commission, deputy state sheriffs employed by the Nebraska
Brand Committee and State Fire Marshal for state law enforcement
purposes, inspectors employed by the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission
or the Nebraska Consumable Hemp Control Commission, and persons employed
by the Tax Commissioner for state revenue enforcement purposes, the
exemption for state law enforcement purposes and state revenue
enforcement purposes being confined strictly to the seven agencies
specifically named;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services or the Department of
Correctional Services for the purpose of apprehending and returning
escaped offenders or parole violators to facilities in the Department of
Correctional Services and transporting offenders and personnel of the
Department of Correctional Services and patients and personnel of the
Department of Health and Human Services who are engaged in off-campus
program activities;
(c) The Military Department;
(d) Vocational rehabilitation counselors and the Department of
Health and Human Services for the purposes of communicable disease
control, for the prevention and control of those communicable diseases
which endanger the public health, or used by the Department of Health and
Human Services in the enforcement of drug control laws or for other
investigation purposes;
(e) The Department of Agriculture for special investigative
-39-

LB16 LB16
2025 2025
purposes;
(f) The Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board for
investigative purposes;
(g) The Insurance Fraud Prevention Division of the Department of
Insurance for investigative purposes; and
(h) The Department of Justice.
Sec. 62. Original sections 53-105, 53-106, 53-110, 53-111, and
81-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 28-1701,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-40-